West Virginia, session 2026, SB493.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 11D. THE MOTION PICTURE FAIR COMPETITION ACT. §47-11D-5. Open Captioning for Motion Pictures. (a) Exhibitors of motion pictures who operate eight or more screens in more than one location in this state shall provide open captioning during at least two showings per week of each motion picture that is produced and offered with open captioning. (b) Upon request, audio description shall be provided for any motion picture that is produced and offered with audio description. (c) Notwithstanding any section of this code to the contrary, no exhibitor may be required to purchase new equipment in order to comply with the requirements set forth in this section where doing so would result in an undue burden to the exhibitor or a fundamental alteration of the theater.  (d) The requirements set forth in this section do not apply to the following:(1) A drive-in movie theater;(2) A theater with fewer than eight screens;(3) A theater that is not equipped with a digital projection system  or a theater with a digital projection system that does not support open-caption files;(4) A motion picture that is shown in a theater fewer than eight times from Friday through Thursday in a seven-day period; (5) Any motion picture shown by a theater after 20 days have passed since the day the movie premiered at that theater.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home